Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3128
Production activity; application for qualification; approval.

(1) If the department determines that an application for qualification is complete and that the production activity qualifies under the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the department shall approve the application, notify the production company of the approval, and issue a screen credit to the production company that can be used to meet the requirements for the tax credit increase under subdivision (3)(a) of section 77-3125.

(2) The department shall consider and approve applications for qualification under the act in the order in which the applications are received.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 8.